Hawaii statutes.
§273-12 Railway to be fenced. The
corporation shall fence in the line of railway with a good and sufficient legal
fence. [L 1878, c 29, §23; RL 1915, §899; RL 1935, §1805; RL 1945, §5063; RL
1955, §106-12; HRS §273-12]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next